North Dakota, session 69, HB1246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 11-19.1-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
11-19.1-06. Individuals authorized to act in absence of coroner.
In those counties in which a coroner does not reside or is not available, the duties of a coroner must
be performed by the sheriff, the state highway patrol, or any special agent of the bureau of criminal
investigation. The sheriff, the state highway patrol, or special agent shall call upon the nearesta coroner
or deputy coroner from an adjacentanother county to investigate the medical cause of death of all
coroner cases within saidthe county. In those situations in which, because of distance or adverse
conditions, a coroner is not available, the sheriff, the state highway patrol, or special agent shall request
the state forensic examiner or the forensic examiner's designee to investigate and certify as to the
medical cause of death.

H. B. NO. 1246 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1246.
House Vote: Yeas 82 Nays 11 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State